en: Bows & Yo-Yos
xx: Bows & Yo-Yos
cs: Mašle a květiny
da: Sløjfer og stofrosetter
de: Schleifen & Rosetten
es: Yoyós y diábolos
fr: Nœuds et yo-yo
it: Fiocchi e coccarde
ja: ボウタイ・ヨーヨーキルト
nl: Strikken en rozetten
no: Sløyfer
pl: Kokardy i kwiaty
pt: Laços e ioiôs
ru: Бабочки и вязаные цветы
sv: Rosetter och blomdekorationer
tr: Fiyonklar ve Yoyolar

en: Decorative Stickers
xx: Decorative Stickers
cs: Dekorativní samolepky
da: Dekorative klistermærker
de: Dekorative Aufkleber
es: Vinilos decorativos
fr: Autocollants décoratifs
it: Adesivi decorativi
ja: 装飾用ステッカー
nl: Decoratieve stickers
no: Dekorative klistremerker
pl: Naklejki dekoracyjne
pt: Adesivos decorativos
ru: Декоративные наклейки
sv: Dekorativa klistermärken
tr: Dekoratif Çıkartmalar

en: Elastic
xx: Elastic
cs: Textilní gumy
da: Elastik
de: Elastikbund
es: Elástico
fr: Élastique
it: Elastico
ja: 伸縮素材
nl: Elastiek
no: Elastikk
pl: Elastyczne
pt: Elástico
ru: Эластичные материалы
sv: Elastiska
tr: Lastikli Şeritler

en: Feathers
xx: Feathers
cs: Peří
da: Fjer
de: Deko-Federn
es: Plumaje
fr: Plumes
it: Piume
ja: 羽根
nl: Vogelveren
no: Fjær
pl: Pióra
pt: Penas
ru: Перья
sv: Fjädermaterial
tr: Tüyler

en: Jewelry Findings
xx: Jewelry Findings
cs: Materiál na výrobu šperků
da: Smykkefund
de: Schmuck-Basisteile
es: Piezas de base para joyería
fr: Accessoires pour bijoux
it: Accessori per gioielli
ja: ジュエリーパーツ
nl: Sieraadverbindingen
no: Smykkeskjøter
pl: Zapięcia do biżuterii
pt: Componentes de joias
ru: Ювелирная фурнитура
sv: Smyckesdelar
tr: Takı Parçaları

en: Loose Stones
xx: Loose Stones
cs: Drahé kameny
da: Løse sten
de: Edelsteine
es: Piedras sueltas
fr: Pierres précieuses
it: Pietre preziose
ja: ルースストーン
nl: Edelstenen
no: Løse steiner
pl: Kamienie luzem
pt: Pedras preciosas
ru: Драгоценные камни
sv: Lösa ädelstenar
tr: İşlenmemiş Değerli Taşlar

en: Rhinestones & Flatbacks
xx: Rhinestones & Flatbacks
cs: Nažehlovací a nalepovací dekorační kamínky
da: Rhinsten
de: Strass & Deko-Elemente
es: Piedras preciosas de imitación
fr: Strass et brillants
it: Strass e lustrini
ja: ラインストーン
nl: Strassteentjes
no: Strass og halvperler
pl: Stras
pt: Strass
ru: Стразы
sv: Strass och flatbackpärlor
tr: Suni Elmaslar

en: Ribbons & Trim
xx: Ribbons & Trim
cs: Stuhy a lemovky
da: Bånd og udsmykning
de: Bänder & Einfassungen
es: Cintas y recortes
fr: Rubans et galons
it: Nastri e trine
ja: リボン・装飾
nl: Linten en biezen
no: Bånd og pynt
pl: Wstążki i taśmy
pt: Fitas e ornamentos
ru: Ленты и накладки
sv: Snören och band
tr: Kurdeleler ve Süsler

en: Sequins & Glitter
xx: Sequins & Glitter
cs: Flitry a třpytky
da: Pailetter og glitter
de: Pailletten & Glitzer
es: Lentejuelas y purpurina
fr: Sequins et paillettes
it: Lustrini e paillette
ja: シークイン・グリッター
nl: Lovertjes en glitter
no: Paljetter og glitter
pl: Cekiny i brokat
pt: Lantejoulas e glitter
ru: Блёстки
sv: Paljetter och glitter
tr: Payetler ve Simler

en: Sew-in Labels
xx: Sew-in Labels
cs: Nášivky
da: Syning – mærker
de: Aufnäher
es: Etiquetas para coser
fr: Étiquettes à coudre
it: Etichette da cucire
ja: 手芸用タグ・ラベル
nl: Etiketten
no: Merker
pl: Metki
pt: Etiquetas costuráveis
ru: Нашивки
sv: Tygetiketter
tr: Dikiş Etiketleri

en: Embossing Powder
xx: Embossing Powder
cs: Prášek na embossing
da: Prægning – pulver
de: Prägepuder
es: Polvo para gofrado
fr: Poudre à gaufrage
it: Polvere per goffratura
ja: エンボス加工パウダー
nl: Reliëfpoeder
no: Pregepulver
pl: Proszek do wytłaczania
pt: Pó para gravação em alto relevo
ru: Порошок для тиснения
sv: Relieftryckpulver
tr: Gofre Tozu

en: Filling & Padding Material
xx: Filling & Padding Material
cs: Výplně a vycpávací materiál
da: Udfyldningsmateriale
de: Füllmaterial
es: Material de relleno y acolchado
fr: Bourre et matériaux de remplissage
it: Materiale per imbottitura
ja: 綿・詰め物
nl: Vullingen en opvulmateriaal
no: Polstring og fyllmaterialer
pl: Materiały do wypychania i wypełniania
pt: Materiais de recheio e enchimento
ru: Материалы для набивки
sv: Stoppnings- och fyllningsmaterial
tr: Dolgu Malzemeleri

en: Batting & Stuffing
xx: Batting & Stuffing
cs: Výplně a vycpávky
da: Vat og fyld
de: Wattierung & Füllung
es: Guata y relleno
fr: Capitonnage et rembourrage
it: Imbottiture in fibre naturali e sintetiche
ja: 詰め物
nl: Watteren en vullen
no: Vatt og polstring
pl: Wypełnienia
pt: Fibras para enchimento
ru: Ватная прокладка и набивка
sv: Vaddering och stoppning
tr: Dolgu Elyafı ve Malzemeleri

en: Filling Pellets
xx: Filling Pellets
cs: Výplňové kuličky
da: Kugler som fyld
de: Füllgranulate
es: Bolitas de relleno
fr: Billes de rembourrage
it: Palline per imbottitura
ja: 手芸用ペレット
nl: Vulkorrels
no: Fyllkuler
pl: Granulaty do wypychania
pt: Grãos para enchimento
ru: Мягкие шарики
sv: Fyllnadskulor
tr: Dolgu Topakları

en: Pillow Forms
xx: Pillow Forms
cs: Sypky na polštáře
da: Pudeindlæg
de: Kissenformen
es: Relleno para cojines
fr: Coussins à recouvrir
it: Forme per cuscini
ja: まくら用中袋
nl: Lege kussens
no: Puteformer
pl: Wypełnienia poduszek
pt: Moldes para travesseiros
ru: Наполнитель для подушек
sv: Innerkuddar
tr: Yastık Kalıpları

en: Leather & Vinyl
xx: Leather & Vinyl
cs: Kůže a vinyl
da: Læder og vinyl
de: Leder & Vinyl
es: Cuero y vinilo
fr: Cuir et vinyle
it: Pelle e vinile
ja: 革・ビニール
nl: Leer en vinyl
no: Lær og vinyl
pl: Skóra i winyl
pt: Couro e vinil
ru: Кожа и винил
sv: Läder och vinyl
tr: Deri ve Vinil

en: Pottery & Sculpting Materials
xx: Pottery & Sculpting Materials
cs: Keramika a sochařství
da: Pottemageri og modellering
de: Töpferei & Bildhauerei
es: Materiales de cerámica y alfarería
fr: Matériaux pour poterie et sculpture
it: Materiali per ceramica e scultura
ja: 陶磁器・彫刻
nl: Pottenbakken en beeldhouwen
no: Materialer til keramikk og skulpturer
pl: Garncarstwo i rzeźbiarstwo
pt: Materiais para cerâmica e escultura
ru: Гончарное дело и лепка
sv: Keramik och skulptering
tr: Çömlekçilik ve Heykelcilik Malzemeleri

en: Clay & Modeling Dough
xx: Clay & Modeling Dough
cs: Modelování z hlíny a těsta
da: Ler til modellering
de: Modellierton & Modelliermasse
es: Arcilla y pasta para modelar
fr: Argile et pâte à modeler
it: Creta e pasta da modellare
ja: 粘土
nl: Modelleerklei en deeg
no: Modellerleire og deig
pl: Glina i ciasto do modelowania
pt: Massa em argila e para modelagem
ru: Глина и пластилин
sv: Modellera
tr: Kil ve El İşi Hamuru

en: Clay
xx: Clay
cs: Modelína
da: Ler
de: Modellierton
es: Arcilla
fr: Argile
it: Creta
ja: 粘土・クレー
nl: Klei
no: Keramikkleire
pl: Glina
pt: Argila
ru: Формовочная глина
sv: Lera
tr: Killer

en: Modeling Dough
xx: Modeling Dough
cs: Modelovací těsto
da: Modellervoks
de: Modelliermasse
es: Pasta para modelar
fr: Pâtes à modeler
it: Pasta da modellare
ja: モデリング生地
nl: Knutselklei
no: Modelleire
pl: Ciastolina
pt: Massa de modelar
ru: Тесто для лепки
sv: Lera och modellera
tr: Oyun Hamurları